Massachusetts, session 194th, S409.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
(i) “Community School”, a public school that utilizes a community school coordinator to
facilitate the establishment of a set of strategic partnerships between the school and other
community resources that leverage shared accountability, collaborative leadership, capacity
building, and family and community engagement, to promote student achievement, and the well-
being of students, families, educators, and neighborhood residents through a variety of engaging
practices including the provision of wraparound services.
(ii) “Community Schools strategy”, a strategy that transforms a school into a community
school where educators, local community members, families, and students work together to
establish shared vision and goals to strengthen conditions for student learning and healthy
of 4

development, including but not limited to the organization of in- and out-of-school resources,
supports, and student opportunities.
(b) There shall be a special legislative commission on community schools, hereinafter
referred to as the commission, to investigate community schools and to make recommendations
regarding the adoption of community schools across the commonwealth. The special legislative
commission shall consist of 15 members: the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on
education, or their designee, who shall serve as co-chairs; the secretary of Education or a
designee; the secretary of Health and Human services or a designee; 1 representative from the
Massachusetts Community Schools Coalition; 1 representative from the American Federation of
Teachers Massachusetts; 1 representative from Massachusetts Teachers Association; 1
representative from United Way of Massachusetts Bay; and 7 members to be appointed by the
Governor: 2 of whom shall be student representatives from existing Massachusetts community
schools, 1 of whom shall be a parent representative from an existing Massachusetts community
schools, 1 of whom shall be a superintendent from a Massachusetts district employing
community school strategies, 1 of whom shall be a principal of a Massachusetts community
school, 1 of whom shall be a Massachusetts community school coordinator, and 1 of whom shall
be a member who represents a community based organization. In making such appointments, the
Governor shall consider rural, urban, and suburban geographic representation across the
commission.
(c) The commission shall: (i) analyze systems, structures, and policies that support
successful community school implementation models and trends in community school model
adoption across different jurisdictions in the Commonwealth and nationwide; (ii) investigate the
policies of other such jurisdictions intended to support and incentivize community school model
of 4

adoption, (iii) provide an assessment of community school adoption, implementation, and
outcomes in Massachusetts; (iv) define the essential elements and principles of implementing
community school models, including but not limited to as an equity strategy; (v) research the
outcomes and evidence associated with community schools model adoption, including but not
limited to reductions in school absenteeism; (vi) investigate the policies of other jurisdictions
intended to support and incentivize community school adoption; (vii) identify any existing
barriers, including but not limited to legal, regulatory, information and training, or funding
barriers for Massachusetts schools to successfully adopt and implement community school
strategies. The commission shall meet not less than once every two months.
(d) The commission shall develop a report of its findings and include specific
recommendations in response to such findings, including any legislative or regulatory changes
necessary for the Commonwealth to implement the commission’s recommendations. At a
minimum, such report shall include: (i) an overview of the findings of the commission’s work
pursuant to subsection (b), including but not limited to policy recommendations relative to
codifying definitions relative to community schools; adopting policies and funding strategies to
incentivize statewide adoption of community school strategies; and, creating sustainable funding
streams in support of local district and school-level adoption and implementation of community
school strategies; (ii) recommendations for a statewide community school pilot program
including, but not limited to: (1) the number and nature of eligible communities to participate in
the pilot program, (2) the resources necessary to support the pilot program, (3) the process by
which pilot funding should be awarded, and (4) the data and outcomes reporting requirements
and criteria for the evaluation of the pilot program and its participants. The commission shall file
its report with the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives, the senate and house
of 4

committees on ways and means, the joint committee on education, the office of the governor, and
the executive office of education not later than February 15, 2026.
of 4